Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1231.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(a) of the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act, is amended to read:Section 5. State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors.(a) Creation.--There is hereby created the State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors, a departmental administrative board in the Department of State. The board shall consist of 13 members [who are citizens of the United States and] who have been residents of this Commonwealth for a two-year period, two of whom shall be public members; five of whom shall be licensed social workers, 12345678910111213141516171819 at least one of whom shall be a licensed clinical social worker and at least one of whom shall be a licensed social worker; two of whom shall be licensed marriage and family therapists; two of whom shall be licensed professional counselors; one of whom shall be either a licensed marriage and family therapist or a licensed professional counselor whose membership shall rotate between those professions at the expiration of the member's second term; and one of whom shall be the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1231PN1447 - 2 - 1234567891011